District of Columbia statutes.
2-1225.01

Dissolution of the boards of directors.

(a)

The Board of Directors of the National Capital Revitalization Corporation (“NCRC”) and the Board of Directors of the RLA Revitalization Corporation (“RLARC”), established by §§ 2-1219.01 [repealed] and 2-1219.31 [repealed], respectively, are dissolved. The Mayor shall succeed to the powers, duties, and responsibilities of the boards of directors of the NCRC and the RLARC.

(b)

The Board of Directors of the Anacostia Waterfront Corporation (“AWC”), established by § 2-1223.05 [repealed], and the boards of directors of its subsidiaries, the Southwest Waterfront Development Corporation (“SWDC”) and the Southwest Waterfront Holdings Corporation (“SWHC”), are dissolved. The Mayor shall succeed to the powers, duties, and responsibilities of the board of directors of the AWC and its subsidiaries.

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 101, 55 DCR 1689
D.C. Law 17-53, § 101, added a section to read as follows:
“Sec. 101. Dissolution of the boards of directors.
“(a) The Board of Directors of the National Capital Revitalization Corporation (‘NCRC’) and the Board of Directors of the RLA Revitalization Corporation (‘RLARC’), established by sections 4 and 30a, respectively, of the National Capital Revitalization Corporation Act of 1998, effective September 11, 1998 (D.C. Law 12-144; D.C. Official Code §§ 2-1219.03 and 2-1219.31), are dissolved. The Mayor shall succeed to the powers, duties, and responsibilities of the boards of directors of the NCRC and the RLARC.
“(b) The Board of Directors of the Anacostia Waterfront Corporation (‘AWC’), established by section 105 of the Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Act of 2004, effective December 7, 2004 (D.C. Law 15-219; D.C. Official Code § 2-1223.05), and the boards of directors of its subsidiaries (the Southwest Waterfront Development Corporation (‘SWDC’) and the Southwest Waterfront Holdings Corporation (‘SWHC’)) are dissolved. The Mayor shall succeed to the powers, duties, and responsibilities of the boards of directors of the AWC and its subsidiaries.”
Section 702(b) of D.C. Law 17-53 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 101 of National Capital Revitalization Corporation and Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Reorganization Clarification Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-71, July 20, 2007, 54 DCR 7390).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 101 of National Capitol Revitalization Corporation and Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Reorganization Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-152, October 18, 2007, 54 DCR 10900).
Delegation of Authority—National Capital Revitalization Corporation and Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Reorganization Clarification Act of 2007, see Mayor’s Order 2008-137, October 20, 2008 ( 55 DCR 12507).
Registration of the Capitol Riverfront Business Improvement District Pursuant to the Business Improvement Districts Act of 1996, effective May 29, 1996 (D.C. Law 11-134; D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.01 et seq. (2006 Supp.)), see Mayor’s Order 2007-183, August 8, 2007 ( 54 DCR 11619).

Section 801 of D.C. Law 17-138 provided: “This act shall sunset on September 30, 2008, if the fiscal effect of this act has not been included in an approved budget and financial plan.”

According to the Budget Director to the Council of the District of Columbia, D.C. Law 17-138 was funded under D.C. Act 17-409.

Section 305(a) of D.C. Law 17-353 repealed section 801 of D.C. Law 17-138. Section 305(b) of D.C. Law 17-353 provided that the section shall apply as of September 29, 2009.